en: oat flour, oatflour
bg: овесено брашно
cs: ovesná mouka
da: havremel
de: Hafermehl, Haferbrei
el: βρμης αλεύρρυζού
es: harina de avena, semola de avena
fi: kaurajauho
fr: farine d'avoine
he: קמח שיבולת שועל
hr: zobeno brašno
hu: zabliszt
it: farina d'avena, farina di avena
ja: オート麦粉
lv: auzu milti
mt: dqiq tal-ħafur
nb: havremel
nl: havermeel
pl: mąka owsiana
pt: farinha de aveia
ru: овсяная мука, мука овсяная
sk: ovsená múka
sl: ovsena moka
sv: havremjöl

en: wholemeal oat flour, whole grain oat flour
bg: пълнозърнесто овесено брашно
cs: ovesná mouka celozrnná
de: Hafer-Vollkornmehl, Hafervollkornmehl, Vollkorn-Hafermehl, Vollkornhafermehl
es: Harina de avena integral, harina integral de avena
fi: täysjyväkaurajauho, täysjyväkaurajauhoa
fr: farine d'avoine complète, farine complète d'avoine
hr: integralno zobeno brašno
hu: teljes kiőrlésű zabliszt
it: farina di avena integrale
nl: volkorenhavermeel
pl: mąka owsiana pełnoziarnista
pt: farinha de aveia integral
sv: fullkornshavremjöl

en: gluten free oat flour
cs: bezlepková ovesná mouka
de: glutenfreies Hafermehl
es: harina de avena libre de gluten, harina de avena sin gluten
fr: farine d'avoine sans gluten
hr: zobeno brašno bez glutena
it: farina di avena senza glutine
pl: bezglutenowa mąka owsiana

en: oat fibre
bg: овесени влакнини, фибри от овес
cs: ovesná vláknina
da: Havrefibre
de: Haferfasern, Haferfaser, Haferpflanzenfaser
el: εδώδιμες ινες βρώμης
es: fibra de avena
fi: kaurakuitu
fr: fibre d'avoine, fibres d'avoine
hr: zobena vlakna
hu: zabrost
it: fibra d'avena, fibra di avena
nl: havervezel, havervezels
pl: błonnik owsiany, błonnik z owsa
pt: fibra de aveia
ro: fibre de ovăz
sk: ovsená vláknina
sl: zobena vlakna
sv: havrefiber
tr: yulaf lifi

en: gluten free oat fibre
cs: bezlepková ovesná vláknina
de: glutenfreie Haferfaser
fr: fibre d'avoine sans gluten
hr: zobena vlakna bez glutena
it: fibra di avena senza glutine
nl: glutenvrije havervezels
pl: błonnik owsiany bezglutenowy, bezglutenowy błonnik owsiany

en: oat husk fiber
de: Haferspelzfaser, Haferspelzfasern
fr: fibre de son d'avoine
it: fibra di buccia d'avena

en: oat bran, oatbran
bg: овесени трици
da: havreklid
de: Haferkleie
es: salvado de avena
fi: kauralese
fr: son d'avoine
hr: zobene mekinje
hu: zabkorpa
it: crusca d'avena
kk: сұлы кебегі
nl: haverzemelen, haverzemelen met kiem
nn: havreklid
pl: otręby owsiane
pt: salvado de avena
ru: отруби овсяные
sv: havrekli

en: oat kernel
de: Haferkern, Haferkörner
sv: havrekärna, havrekärnor

en: oat milk
ar: حليب الشوفان
bg: овесено мляко
cs: ovesné mléko
da: havredrik
de: Haferdrink, Hafermilch
eo: avenlakto
es: bebida de avena
et: kaerahelbepiim
fi: kauramaito
fr: Lait d'avoine
he: חלב שיבולת-שועל
hr: zobeno mlijeko
it: latte d'avena
jv: susu oat
nl: havermelk
pl: mleko owsiane, napój owsiany
pt: bebida de aveia
se: hávvarmielki
sv: havredryck
uk: вівсяне молоко
zh: 燕麦奶

en: oat base
de: haferbasis
es: base de avena
fi: kaurapohja
fr: jus d'avoine, base d'avoine
hr: sirup od zobi
it: base de avena
nl: haverbasis
sv: havrebas

en: oat protein
de: haferprotein
fi: kauraproteiini
fr: protéine d'avoine, protéines d'avoine
hr: protein zobi
it: proteine di avena
sv: havreprotein

en: oat malt
hr: zobeni slad
it: malto d'avena

en: quinoa
xx: quinoa
ar: كينوا
ay: jiwra
az: kinoa
bg: киноа
cs: merlík čilský
da: quinoa, kvinoa, peruansk ris
de: Quinoa, Reismelde, peruanischer Reis
el: κινόα, χηνοπόδιον η κουινόα
eo: kvinoo
es: quinoa, quinua, quinoa real
et: kinoa, tšiili hanemalts
eu: kinoa
fa: کینوآ
fi: kvinoa
fr: quinoa
ga: cuineo
he: קינואה
hi: क्विन्वा
hr: kvinoja, kvinojine
hu: kinoa, quinoa, rizsparéj
hy: uագախոտ
id: kinoa
is: kínóa
it: quinoa
ja: キヌア
kn: ಕೀನೋವಾ
ko: 퀴노아
la: chenopodium quinoa
lt: bolivinė balanda
ms: kuinoa
nl: quinoa, gierstmelde
pl: komosa ryżowa, quinoa, komosy ryżowej
qu: kinwa
ru: киноа
sh: kinoa
sl: kvinoja
sr: kvinoja
ta: கினோவா
th: กีนัว
tr: kinoa
uk: кіноа
vi: diêm mạch

en: quinoa seeds
de: Quinoa-Samen, Quinoasamen, Quinoa Samen
es: semillas de quinoa
fr: Graines de quinoa
hr: sjemenke kvinoje
it: semi di quinoa
pl: nasiona komosy ryżowej, ziarna komosy ryżowej

en: red quinoa
bg: червена киноа
de: rotes Quinoa, roter Quinoa, Quinoa rot
es: Quinoa roja
fi: punainen kvinoa
fr: quinoa rouge
hr: quinoa crvena
hu: vörös kinoa
it: Quinoa rossa
pl: komosa ryżowa czerwona

en: black quinoa
bg: черна киноа
de: schwarzes Quinoa, schwarzer Quinoa, Quinoa schwarz
es: quinoa negra
fr: quinoa noir
hr: crna kvinoja
it: quinoa nera
nl: zwarte quinoa
pl: komosa ryżowa czarna
pt: quinoa preta

en: white quinoa
bg: бяла киноа
de: weiße Quinoa, weißer Quinoa, Quinoa weiß
es: quinoa blanca
fi: valkoinen kvinoa
fr: quinoa blanc, quinoa blond
hr: bijela kvinoja, quinoa bijela
hu: fehér kinoa
it: quinoa bianca
pl: komosa ryżowa biała
pt: quinoa branco

en: oganic white quinoa
hr: eko quinoa bijela
it: quinoa bianca biologica

en: white quinoa flour
de: weißes Quinoamehl, weißes Quinoa-Mehl
es: harina de quinoa blanca
fr: Farine de quinoa blanche
hr: bijelo brašno od kvinoje
it: farina di quinoa bianca

en: red and white quinoa, white and red quinoa
fr: quinoa rouge et blanc, quinoa blanc et rouge
hr: crvena i bijela kvinoja
it: quinoa rossa e bianca